District of Columbia statutes.
9-1215.03

Repealed

Selection criteria.

Repealed.

Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-98, § 4, 45 DCR 1519
Dec. 9, 2003, D.C. Law 15-51, § 2, 50 DCR 8982
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 258, 62 DCR 1884
1981 Ed., § 7-233.
D.C. Law 15-51, in subsec. (d), substituted “25” for “10”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-230, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3472).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-93, March 19, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 2998).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-265, March 27, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2942).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Make a Difference Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-484, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 17).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-19, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2697).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-178, November 19, 2001, 48 DCR 11060).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-307, March 25, 2002, 49 DCR 3410).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-542, December 2, 2002, 49 DCR 11662).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Make a Difference Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-233, November 25, 2003, 50 DCR 10732).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 258 of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).